Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.720

Use of proceeds specified.

All receipts from the sale of stock or seed shall be deposited in a state forest nursery revolving fund to be maintained by the department, which is hereby authorized to use all money in said fund for the maintenance of the state tree nursery or the planting of denuded state owned lands.

During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the state forest nursery revolving fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

[ 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 918; 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 938; 1988 c 128 s 36; 1947 c 67 s 2; RRS s 5823-41. Formerly RCW 76.12.170.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 2nd sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Severability—Effective date—2003 1st sp.s. c 25: See notes following RCW 19.28.351.